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DIAGNOSTICS - SUBFUELTANKSYSTEM

DI3MG-02

DTC 32 Sub Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Item

Trouble Area

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON
32 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is high)
(b) Voltage of FPM terminal is low

(c) Voltage of FPMR terminal is low

* Open orshortin subfuel pump circuit
e Sub fuel pump

e Fueltank selectrelay

e Fuelpumprelay

« Circuitopeningrelay

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-138.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

ground.

1 Checkvoltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU connector and body

@ON Fuel Tank Changeover

Switch is ON

BE6653
A05662 = A05666

@

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(¢) Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPMR of engine ECU and
body ground, turntheignition switch ON after 4 seconds or
more.
OK:
Voltage:9 -14V

OK> Go to step 5.

2 [ Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-56).
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NG% place fueltankselectrelay.
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3 | Check fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page FI-54).

@

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.

4 [ Check circuit opening relay (Marking: C/OPN) (See page FI-53).

@

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

5 | Check operation of sub fuel pump.

B04440

@

PREPARATION:

(@) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

() Push the fuel tank changeover switch ON.

(d) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode.

CHECK:

Check the sub fuel pump operation, when it is operated by
hand-heldtester.

OK:

Here a sub fuel pump operation noise
HINT:
Ifyouhavenohand -heldtester,andthengotostep6.

0K> Go to step 7.

6 | Check sub fuel pump (See page FI-16).
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NG> Replace sub fuel pump.
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7 | Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and fuel pump relay, fuel pump relay
and circuit opening relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace.

@

8 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and conector.

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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